Tennessee, session 114, SB1896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2101(a), is amended by
redesignating the subsection as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision:
(2) If a board of education contracts for transportation services with persons
owning equipment pursuant to subsection (d), then the board of education shall provide
school transportation facilities to all students who live more than one and one-half (1 1/2)
miles by the nearest accessible route from the school to which they are assigned by the
board of education and in which they are enrolled.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1896
009084
- 1 -